Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 1. Power Assistance Programs.

Sec. 42.45.010.
Power project fund.

The power project fund is established as a separate fund. The fund shall be distinct from any other money or funds of the authority and includes only money appropriated by the legislature, proceeds from the sale of loans appropriated by the legislature, and money deposited under (g) of this section.

The authority may make loans from the power project fund

to electric utilities, regional electric authorities, municipalities, regional and village corporations, village councils, and independent power producers to pay the costs of

reconnaissance studies, feasibility studies, license and permit applications, preconstruction engineering, and design of power projects; and

constructing, equipping, modifying, improving, and expanding small-scale power production facilities that are designed to produce less than 10 megawatts of power, bulk fuel storage facilities, and transmission and distribution facilities, including energy production, transmission and distribution, waste energy, energy conservation, energy efficiency, and alternative energy facilities and equipment;

to a borrower for a power project or for bulk fuel, waste energy, energy conservation, energy efficiency, or alternative energy facilities or equipment if

the loan is entered into under a leveraged lease financing arrangement;

the party that will be responsible for the power project or the bulk fuel, waste energy, energy conservation, energy efficiency, or alternative energy facilities or equipment is an electric utility, regional electric authority, municipality, regional or village corporation, village council, or independent power producer; and

the borrower seeking the loan demonstrates to the authority that the financing arrangement for the power project or the bulk fuel, waste energy, energy conservation, energy efficiency, or alternative energy facilities or equipment will reduce financing costs for the project, facilities, or equipment below costs of comparable public power projects, facilities, or equipment.

Before making a loan from the power project fund, the authority shall, by regulation, specify

standards for the eligibility of borrowers and the types of projects to be financed with loans;

standards regarding the technical and economic viability and revenue self-sufficiency of eligible projects;

collateral or other security required for loans;

the terms and conditions of loans;

criteria to establish financial feasibility and to measure the amount of state assistance necessary for particular projects to meet the financial feasibility criteria; and

other relevant criteria, standards, or procedures.

The authority may adopt regulations to establish the standards, criteria, and procedures for making loans under this section, including regulations to establish reasonable fees for applications and loan origination, and charges for reimbursement of the costs of analyzing the feasibility of a project.

Repayment of the loans shall be secured in any manner that the authority determines is feasible to assure prompt repayment under a loan agreement entered into with the borrower. The authority may make an unsecured loan from the power project fund to a borrower regulated by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska under AS 42.05 if the borrower has a substantial history of repaying long-term loans and the capacity to repay the loan. Under a loan agreement, repayment may be deferred for 10 years or until the project for which the loan is made has achieved earnings from its operations sufficient to pay the loan, whichever is earlier.

A loan for power projects and bulk fuel, waste energy, energy conservation, energy efficiency, and alternative energy facilities or equipment

may not be granted for a term that exceeds 50 years; and

shall be granted at an interest rate that is not less than zero percent and that is the lesser of

a rate equal to the percentage that is the average weekly yield of municipal bonds for the 12 months preceding the date of the loan, as determined by the authority from municipal bond yield rates reported in the 30-year revenue index of The Bond Buyer; or

a rate determined by the authority that allows the project to meet criteria of financial feasibility established under (c) of this section.

Loan repayments and interest earned by loans from the power project fund shall be deposited in the power project fund unless an appropriation to fund the loan directs otherwise.

The legislature may forgive the repayment of a loan made from the power project fund for a reconnaissance study or a feasibility study when the authority finds that the power project for which the loan was made is not feasible.

Money in the power project fund may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for costs of administering the fund.

The authority may not enter into a loan from the power project fund for a major project unless it has legislative approval of the project and the amount. An appropriation for the loan that names the project constitutes approval required by this subsection. A major project is a project in which the cumulative state monetary involvement, through loans, grants, and bonds, is at least $5,000,000 or a project for which a loan of more than $5,000,000 has been requested.

The authority may collect the fees and charges established under (d) of this section and shall deposit the money in the general fund.

The authority may sell loans of the power project fund with legislative approval. The authority may use money in the power project fund to repurchase loans sold under this subsection that default. Money received by the authority from the sale of loans under this subsection shall be deposited into the power project fund under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 5 ch 18 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 36 SLA 2004; am § 36 ch 12 SLA 2006; am §§ 2, 3 ch 110 SLA 2008; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 70 SLA 2010; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in subsection (e) “Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(a), ch. 25, SLA 1999. In 1999, in this section, “department” was changed to “authority” in accordance with § 91(b), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Cross references. —

For legislative authorization and approval of the sale and purchase of certain power project fund loans between the Alaska Energy Authority and the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority for the purposes as described in the section, and a declaration that the provision constitutes the legislative approval required under subsection (

l

) of this section and AS

44.88.030

(30), see § 5, ch. 70, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.
For legislative authorization and approval of a loan from the authority for the Reynolds Creek hydroelectric project and a declaration that the provision constitutes the legislative approval for the loan required by (j) of this section, see § 6, ch. 70, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative authorization and approval of the Reynolds Creek hydroelectric project and the Cordova Electric Cooperative Humpback Creek hydroelectric project, and a declaration that the provisions constitute the approval required by (j) of this section, see § 6, ch. 6, FSSLA 2011, in the 2011 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative authorization and approval of a loan from the power project fund for the Metlakatla Power and Light Triangle Lake hydroelectric project, and a declaration that the provisions constitute the approval required by (j) of this section, see § 3, ch. 61, SLA 2012, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

For legislative authorization of a loan for the Blue Lake hydroelectric project and a declaration that the provision constitutes the legislative approval for the loan required by (j) of this section, see Sec. 7, ch. 20, SLA 2014, in the 2014 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For loan from power project fund, see 3 AAC 106, art. 1.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 70, SLA 2010 (SB 301), proposing amendments to this section to facilitate recapitalization of the loan fund, see 2010 Senate Journal 1664 — 1666.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A PPF loan may be made to Cordova Electric Cooperative (CEC) for the purpose of CEC using the loan funds to pay developer to develop a project which is specifically for CEC, and which CEC has already obligated itself to purchase, once developer has made it capable of commercial operation. The loan funds were to be used for costs which are allowable under the PPF statutes. December 5, 1995, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 42.45.020.
Rural electrification revolving loan fund.

The rural electrification revolving loan fund is established in the authority. The fund consists of

appropriations made to the fund; and

repayments of principal and interest on loans made under this section.

The authority may make loans from the rural electrification revolving loan fund to electric utilities certified under AS 42.05. A loan from the fund may be made only for the purpose of extending new electric service into an area of the state that an electric utility may serve under a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued under AS 42.05. A loan may be made from the fund to an electric utility if the utility invests the money necessary to provide one pole, one span of line, one transformer, and one service drop for each consumer for whom immediate service would be provided by the extension of electric service. However, a loan may not be made from the fund unless the extension of electric service would provide immediate service to at least three consumers.

A loan from the rural electrification revolving loan fund shall bear an annual rate of interest of two percent of the unpaid balance of the loan.

When the authority makes a loan under this section, the electric utility receiving the loan shall,

in addition to the rates that it is authorized to charge, charge the consumers served by the electric service extended with the loan proceeds an amount sufficient to pay the interest costs of the loan;

pay to the authority annually an amount equal to

interest of two percent on the unpaid balance of the loan; and

payments on the unpaid balance of the principal of the loan for each new consumer served by the electric service extended with the loan proceeds; payments on the unpaid balance of the principal of the loan shall be made at a rate equal to the difference between the actual cost of making the service connection to the consumers and the minimum investment per consumer required of the utility before a loan is made under (b) of this section.

The authority shall

adopt regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this section; and

administer the rural electrification revolving loan fund.

Money in the rural electrification revolving loan fund may be used by the legislature to make appropriations for costs of administering the fund.

On June 30 of each fiscal year the unexpended and unobligated cash balance of the fund that is attributable to loans owned by the fund lapses into the general fund.

In this section,

“consumer” means a person or a governmental agency, if the person or governmental agency requests and offers to pay for electrical service to a facility or part of a facility; the authority shall consider a person who, or a governmental agency that, offers to pay for electrical service to several facilities to be a separate consumer for each facility, if each facility is physically separate from another facility, other than through electric service lines, and if the person or governmental agency requests and offers to pay for electrical service to each facility;

“facility” means a structure capable of receiving and using electrical energy; and

“governmental agency” includes, with respect to the state or federal government or a municipal government, a legislative body, board of regents, administrative body, board, commission, committee, subcommittee, authority, council, agency, public corporation, school board, department, division, bureau, or other subordinate unit, whether advisory or otherwise, of the state, federal, or municipal government.

History.

(§ 5 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 83 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 20 ch 25 SLA 1999; am § 84 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 36 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “department” was changed to “authority” in accordance with § 91(b), ch. 58, SLA 1999, at which time subsection (b) was reorganized to reflect the 1999 repeal of (b)(1).

Administrative Code. —

For loans from rural electrification revolving loan fund, see 3 AAC 106, art. 2.

Sec. 42.45.030.
Loan advisory committee.

[Repealed, § 84 ch 58 SLA 1999.]

.

Sec. 42.45.040.
Southeast energy fund.

The Southeast energy fund is established as a separate fund. The fund consists of

money appropriated to the fund by the legislature;

money transferred to it under former AS

42.45.050

;

gifts, bequests, contributions from other sources, and federal money;

interest earned on the fund balance; and

investments, to be managed by the Department of Revenue, which shall be the fiduciary of the fund under AS

37.10.071

.

The fund is not a dedicated fund.

The authority may make grants from the Southeast energy fund to a municipality of the state, a joint action agency established under AS

42.45.300

and

42.45.310

, a member-owned electric cooperative established under AS 10.25, or another electric utility holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity under AS 42.05 for power projects, repayment of loans, and payments on bonds for hydroelectric projects and electrical transmission lines or interties serving Southeast Alaska that are entirely owned by the grantee.

An appropriation from the fund for a project described in (c) of this section lapses back into the fund if substantial, ongoing work on the project has not begun within seven years after the effective date of the appropriation.

History.

(§ 5 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 5 ch 60 SLA 2000; am § 13 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “department” was changed to “authority” in accordance with § 91(b), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The department is not required to pursue annual appropriations in order to disburse moneys in the southeast energy fund and the power cost equalization and rural electric capitalization fund once the legislature has capitalized those funds. September 27, 1995 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 42.45.045.
Renewable energy grant fund and recommendation program.

A renewable energy grant fund is established as a separate fund to finance certain energy projects in Alaska.

The authority shall administer the fund as a fund distinct from other funds of the authority. The fund consists of

money appropriated to the fund by the legislature to provide grants for certain energy projects determined by the legislature;

gifts, bequests, contributions from other sources, and federal money;

interest earned on the fund balance; and

investments to be managed by the Department of Revenue, which shall be the fiduciary of the fund under AS

37.10.071

.

The fund is not a dedicated fund.

The authority shall, in consultation with the advisory committee established under (i) of this section and the Department of Natural Resources,

develop a methodology for determining the order of projects that may receive assistance, including separate requirements for grant eligibility, and adopt regulations identifying criteria to evaluate the benefit and feasibility of projects for which an applicant applies for support from the legislature, with the most weight being given to projects that serve any area in which the average cost of energy to each resident of the area exceeds the average cost to each resident of other areas of the state, and significant weight being given to a statewide balance of grant funds and to the amount of matching funds an applicant is able to make available;

make recommendations to the legislature for renewable power production reimbursement grants; and

not later than 10 days after the first day of each regular legislative session, submit to the legislature a report summarizing and reviewing each grant application submitted under this section and a recommended priority for awarding grants.

In consultation with the advisory committee established in (i) of this section, the authority shall make recommendations to the legislature regarding eligible applicants’ projects that finance feasibility studies, reconnaissance studies, energy resource monitoring, and construction of renewable energy projects, natural gas projects, or transmission or distribution infrastructure located in Alaska that meet the requirements of (f), (g), or (h) of this section, as applicable, and shall, at least once each year, solicit from the advisory committee funding recommendations for all grants.

For a renewable energy project to qualify for a grant recommendation under (e) of this section, the project must

be a new project not in operation on August 20, 2008 or an addition to an existing project made after August 20, 2008; and

be a

hydroelectric facility;

direct use of renewable energy resources;

facility that generates electricity from fuel cells that use hydrogen from renewable energy resources or natural gas; or

facility that generates energy from renewable energy resources.

To qualify for a grant recommendation under (e) of this section, a project that is a natural gas project must benefit a community that

has a population of 10,000 or less; and

does not have economically viable renewable energy resources it can develop.

To qualify for a grant recommendation under (e) of this section, transmission or distribution infrastructure must link a renewable energy project or natural gas project to the transmission or distribution infrastructure. A grant may be recommended under this subsection even if the grant applicant is not itself financing the construction of the renewable energy project or natural gas project.

An advisory committee is established and consists of nine members, appointed as follows:

five members shall be appointed by the governor to staggered three-year terms, with one representative to be appointed from each of the following groups:

small Alaska rural electric utilities;

large Alaska urban electric utilities;

Alaska Native organizations;

businesses or organizations engaged in the renewable energy sector; and

the Denali Commission established under P.L. 105-277, 42 U.S.C. 3121 note;

two members of the house of representatives shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and

two members of the senate shall be appointed by the president of the senate.

A member of the advisory committee appointed under (i) of this section serves without compensation but is entitled to travel and per diem expenses as provided in AS

39.20.180

.

The legislature may appropriate money for grants from the renewable energy grant fund for renewable energy projects described in this section.

In this section,

“eligible applicant” means an electric utility holding a certificate of public convenience and necessity under AS 42.05, independent power producer, local government, or other governmental utility, including a tribal council and housing authority;

“fund” means the renewable energy grant fund;

“hydroelectric facility” has the meaning given to the term “project” under AS

42.45.350

;

“natural gas project” means use or access of natural gas other than landfill or digester gas;

“renewable energy resources” means

wind, solar, geothermal, wasteheat recovery, hydrothermal, wave, tidal, river in-stream, or hydropower;

low-emission nontoxic biomass based on solid or liquid organic fuels from wood, forest and field residues, or animal or fish products;

dedicated energy crops available on a renewable basis; or

landfill gas and digester gas.

History.

(§ 3 ch 31 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 12 SLA 2012)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under
§ 5, ch. 31, SLA 2008, as amended by sec. 3, ch. 12, SLA 2012, this section is repealed June 30, 2023.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent relating to appropriations to the renewable energy grant fund, see § 1, ch. 12, SLA 2012, in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 42.45.050.
Four dam pool transfer fund. [Repealed, § 12 ch 60 SLA 2000.]

Sec. 42.45.060.
Approval by loan committee and legislature. [Repealed, § 11 ch 36 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 42.45.065.
Reimbursement for costs of power projects.

Subject to appropriations for the purpose, during each fiscal year, the authority shall allocate to each entity listed in (b) of this section an amount to reimburse the cost paid by the entity during the immediately preceding fiscal year for the principal and interest on outstanding debt for the project listed. An allocation may be made to an entity only if

the debt was incurred before July 1, 2005; and

the power project financed with the debt proceeds is owned and operated by the entity.

The authority may make an allocation to an entity under (a) of this section only for reimbursement of costs incurred for construction and renovation of the following power projects and only for reimbursement of total project costs incurred up to the following amounts:

PROJECT Kodiak Electric Association, Inc. (Nyman Combined $ 6,000,000
Cycle Cogeneration Plant) Cordova Electric Cooperative (Power Creek Hydropower 12,000,000
Station) Golden Valley Electric Association (Rock Creek line 700,000
extension) Copper Valley Electric Association, Inc., Valdez 10,000,000
(cogeneration projects) The Four Dam Pool Power Agency (Southeast Intertie, 20,000,000
Swan Lake to Tyee Lake) Metlakatla Power and Light (utility plant and capital 3,000,000
additions)

Click to view

History.

(§ 6 ch 115 SLA 2002)